Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5035.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Notwithstanding any other general or special law to the contrary, Ryan Kenny
and Brenna Sorkin may join Simran Bhajan Nebhnani and Louis Charles Miyara in marriage within
the City of Newport, Rhode Island, on or about April 26, 2025. Ryan Kenny and Brenna Sorkin are
hereby authorized and empowered to join the foregoing persons in marriage pursuant to and in
accordance with Chapter 3 of Title 15 of the General Laws, entitled "Solemnization of Marriages."
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC000038
========